Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means those boards specified in RCW 18.235.020(2)(b).

(2) "Department" means the department of licensing.

(3)(a) "Director" means the:

(i) Executive director of the state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors for matters under the authority of the state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors established under chapter 18.43 RCW; or

(ii) Director of the department or the director's designee in all other contexts.

(b) The director of the department has no authority under this chapter over the state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors.

(4) "Disciplinary action" means sanctions identified in RCW 18.235.110.

(5) "Disciplinary authority" means the director, board, or commission having the authority to take disciplinary action against a holder of, or applicant for, a professional or business license upon a finding of a violation of this chapter or a chapter specified under RCW 18.235.020.

(6) "License," "licensing," and "licensure" are deemed equivalent to the terms "license," "licensing," "licensure," "certificate," "certification," and "registration" as those terms are defined in RCW 18.118.020. Each of these terms, and the term "commission" under chapter 42.45 RCW, are interchangeable under the provisions of this chapter.

(7) "Unlicensed practice" means:

(a) Practicing a profession or operating a business identified in RCW 18.235.020 without holding a valid, unexpired, unrevoked, and unsuspended license to do so; or

(b) Representing to a person, through offerings, advertisements, or use of a professional title or designation, that the individual or business is qualified to practice a profession or operate a business identified in RCW 18.235.020 without holding a valid, unexpired, unrevoked, and unsuspended license to do so.

[ 2019 c 442 s 21; 2017 c 281 s 36; 2007 c 256 s 11; 2002 c 86 s 102.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 c 281: See RCW 42.45.905.